fi: Vesikulkuneuvon ohjausvaijerin mukana toimitettavat laitteistot: Suojus/tiiviste; Vain kaapeli; Haarukkaliitin ja tappi -sarja; Käyttöohje; Voiteluaine; Kiinnitysmutterit; Muu / ei määritetty; Ohjausvarren linkki; Muu
zh-CN: 包含船舶转向电缆硬件: 护套/密封件; 仅拉线; U 型夹和销钉套件; 说明书; 润滑剂; 安装螺母; 其他/未指定; 舵柄连杆; 其他
da: Medfølgende monteringsdele til styrekabel til fartøj: Muffe/tætning; Kun kabel; Gaffelboltesæt; Brugermanual; Smøremiddel; Monteringsmøtrikker; Andet/uspecificeret; Rorpindsforbindelse; Andet
ja: 水上バイク用ステアリングケーブル付属ハードウェア: ブーツ/シール; ケーブルのみ; クレビスおよびピンキット; 取扱説明書; 潤滑剤; 取付ナット; その他/指定なし; ティラーアームリンク; その他
pt-PT: Ferragens incluídas no cabo de direção da embarcação: Fole/vedante; Apenas cabo; Kit de forquilha e cavilha; Manual de instruções; Lubrificante; Porcas de montagem; Outro/não especificado; Elo do braço do leme; Outro
zh-TW: 包含船艇轉向纜線五金配件: 防塵套/密封件; 僅纜線; 鉤環與插銷套件; 說明書; 潤滑劑; 安裝螺帽; 其他/未指定; 舵柄連桿; 其他
ru: Комплект крепежа рулевого троса водного транспорта: Пыльник/уплотнитель; Только трос; Комплект скобы и штифта; Руководство по эксплуатации; Смазка; Крепежные гайки; Другое / не указано; Рычаг румпеля; Другое
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα εξαρτήματα καλωδίου διεύθυνσης σκάφους: Προστατευτικό/τσιμούχα; Μόνο καλώδιο; Κιτ δίχαλου και πείρου; Εγχειρίδιο οδηγιών; Λιπαντικό; Παξιμάδια στερέωσης; Άλλο/μη καθορισμένο; Σύνδεσμος βραχίονα λαγουδέρας; Άλλο
nl: Watervaartuig stuurkabel hardware inbegrepen: Hoes/afdichting; Alleen kabel; Gaffel- en pennenset; Handleiding; Smeermiddel; Montagemoeren; Anders/niet gespecificeerd; Koppelstang voor stuurarm; Overige
tr: Dahil olan deniz aracı direksiyon kablosu donanımı: Körük/conta; Yalnızca kablo; Çatal pim ve kopilya kiti; Kullanım kılavuzu; Yağlayıcı; Montaj somunları; Diğer/belirtilmemiş; Yeke kolu bağlantısı; Diğer
vi: Trang thiết bị cáp lái tàu thủy đi kèm: Ống bọc/vòng bịt; Chỉ có cáp; Bộ vòng kẹp và chốt; Sổ tay hướng dẫn; Chất bôi trơn; Đai ốc gắn; Khác/không xác định; Thanh nối cần lái; Khác
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia je aj hardvér riadenia plavidla: Kryt/tesnenie; Iba lanko; Súprava vidlice a čapu; Návod na použitie; Mazivo; Montážne matice; Iné/nešpecifikované; Tiahlo ramena kormidla; Iné
sv: Ingående hårdvara för styrvajer till vattenskoter: Damask/tätning; Endast kabel; Schackel- och sprintkit; Bruksanvisning; Smörjmedel; Monteringsmuttrar; Övrigt/ospecificerat; Rorkultsarm; Övrigt
cs: Zahrnuté montážní prvky kormidelního lanovodu plavidla: Manžeta/těsnění; Pouze kabel; Sada vidlice a čepu; Návod k použití; Mazivo; Montážní matice; Jiné / nespecifikováno; Táhlo kormidelní páky; Jiné
hu: Vízi jármű kormánykábeléhez mellékelt eszközök: Védőburkolat/tömítés; Csak kábel; Villás rögzítő és csapszegkészlet; Használati útmutató; Kenőanyag; Rögzítőanyák; Egyéb / nincs megadva; Kormányrúd-csatlakozás; Egyéb
th: รวมสายพวงมาลัยเรือฮาร์ดแวร์แล้ว: ยางหุ้ม/ซีล; สายเคเบิลเท่านั้น; ชุดเคลวิสและสลัก; คู่มือการใช้งาน; สารหล่อลื่น; น็อตยึด; อื่นๆ/ไม่ได้ระบุ; ก้านต่อแขนหางเสือ; อื่นๆ
it: Bulloneria per il cavo di sterzo del natante inclusa: Cuffia/guarnizione; Solo cavo; Kit con forcella e perno; Manuale di istruzioni; Lubrificante; Dadi di montaggio; Altro/non specificato; Barra di accoppiamento; Altro
lt-LT: Pridedamas vandens transporto priemonės vairo trosas techninė įranga: Apsauga / sandariklis; Tik laidas; Apkabo ir kaiščio rinkinys; Naudojimo instrukcija; Tepalas; Tvirtinimo veržlės; Kita / nenurodyta; Rumpelio svirties jungtis; Kita
ko: 수상 차량 조향 케이블 하드웨어 포함: 부트/실; 케이블만; 클레비스 및 핀 키트; 사용 설명서; 윤활제; 장착 너트; 기타/지정되지 않음; 틸러 암 링크; 기타
bg-BG: Включен монтажен хардуер за кормилно жило на плавателен съд: Маншон/уплътнение; Само кабел / жило; Комплект скоба и щифт; Ръководство за употреба; Смазка; Монтажни гайки; Други/неуточнено; Лост за управление / Щанга за румпел; Други
fr: Matériel de montage inclus avec le câble de direction d’embarcation: Soufflet/joint; Câble uniquement; Kit de chape et goupille; Manuel d’instructions; Lubrifiant; Écrous de montage; Autre/non spécifié; Biellette de barre franche; Autre
pt-BR: Cabo de direção de embarcação ferragens incluídas: Coifa/vedação; Apenas cabo; Kit de manilha e pino; Manual de instruções; Lubrificante; Porcas de montagem; Outros/não especificado; Articulação do braço do leme; Outros
de: Enthaltenes Zubehör für das Wasserfahrzeug-Lenkkabel: Manschette/Dichtung; Nur Kabel; Gabelkopf- und Bolzen-Set; Bedienungsanleitung; Schmiermittel; Befestigungsmuttern; Sonstige/Keine Angabe; Steuerarm-Verbindung; Sonstige
en: Watercraft steering cable hardware included: Boot/seal; Cable only; Clevis and pin kit; Instruction manual; Lubricant; Mounting nuts; Other/unspecified; Tiller arm link; Other
nb: Monteringsutstyr for båtens styrekabel inkludert: Mansjett/tetning; Kun kabel; Gaffel- og boltesett; Bruksanvisning; Smøremiddel; Monteringsmutre; Annet / uspesifisert; Rorkultledd; Annet
ro-RO: Accesorii de fixare incluse pentru cablul de direcție al ambarcațiunii: Burduf/garnitură; Doar cablu; Kit furcă și bolț; Manual de instrucțiuni; Lubrifiant; Piulițe de fixare; Altele/nespecificat; Legătură braț de cârmă; Altele
es: Incluye hardware del cable de dirección de la embarcación: Funda/sello; Solo cable; Kit de horquilla y pasador; Manual de instrucciones; Lubricante; Tuercas de montaje; Otro/no especificado; Enlace del brazo del timón; Otro
pl: Osprzęt dołączony do linki sterowej jednostki pływającej: Osłona/uszczelka; Tylko cięgno; Zestaw z widełkami i sworzniem; Instrukcja obsługi; Smar; Nakrętki mocujące; Inne/nieokreślone; Łącznik ramienia steru; Inne
hr-HR: Uključen hardver kabela za upravljanje plovilom: Zaštitna manšeta / brtva; Samo kabel; Komplet vilice i svornjaka; Priručnik s uputama; Mazivo; Matice za montažu; Ostalo / nije navedeno; Spojnica poluge kormila; Ostalo
sl-SI: Priložena strojna oprema za krmilni kabel plovila: Zaščitna manšeta/tesnilo; Samo kabel; Komplet sornika in razcepke; Navodila za uporabo; Mazivo; Pritrdilne matice; Drugo/ni določeno; Povezava krmilne ročice; Drugo